Nevada, session 83, AB23.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. NRS 341.141 is hereby amended to read as follows:
341.141 1. The Division shall furnish engineering and
architectural services to the Nevada System of Higher Education
and all other state departments, boards or commissions charged with
-
*AB23*

– 2 –
the construction of any building constructed on state property or for
which the money is appropriated by the Legislature, except:
(a) Buildings used in maintaining highways;
(b) Improvements, other than nonresidential buildings with more
than 1,000 square feet in floor area, made:
(1) In state parks by the State Department of Conservation
and Natural Resources; or
(2) By the Department of Wildlife;
(c) Buildings of the Nevada System of Higher Education:
(1) That are exempted pursuant to subsection 1 of NRS
341.1407; or
(2) To which subsection 1 of NRS 341.1407 applies if the
Administrator has delegated his or her authority in accordance with
NRS 341.119; [and]
(d) Buildings of the Office of the Military; and
(e) Buildings on property controlled by other state agencies if
the Administrator has delegated his or her authority in accordance
with NRS 341.119.
 The Board of Regents of the University of Nevada and all other
state departments, boards or commissions shall use those services.
2. The services must consist of:
(a) Preliminary planning;
(b) Designing;
(c) Estimating of costs; and
(d) Preparation of detailed plans and specifications.
Sec. 2. This act becomes effective on July 1, 2025.
H
-
*AB23*